doc/docbook/resources/other/offo/source/hyph/el.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<hyphenation-info>

<!-- Hyphenation patterns for uni-accent (monotonic) Modern Greek -->

<!-- (more info about the licence to be added later) -->

<!-- **************************************************************** -->

<!-- File name: grmhyph5-unicode.tex -->

<!-- This file was first created by mechanical translation from  -->
<!-- GRMhyph5.tex via "elhyph-utf8 -m -c" (version 0.1 by Peter  -->
<!-- Heslin ‐‐ p.j.heslin@durham.ac.uk). Some additions were  -->
<!-- also made by hand. -->

<!-- Created:       June 6, 2008 -->

<!-- Hyphenation patterns for Modern Monotonic Greek. -->

<!-- Created by Dimitrios Filippou with some ideas borrowed from  -->
<!-- Yannis Haralambous, Kostis Dryllerakis and Claudio Beccari. -->
 
<!-- These hyphenation patterns are explained in "ancient.pdf". -->
<!-- Hyphenation examples are given in the file "anc-test.pdf". -->
<!-- Some doubtful patterns are marked by three question marks "???".  -->
 
<!-- Documentation in English can be found in: D. Filippou,  -->
<!-- "Hyphenation patterns for Ancient and Modern Greek," in  -->
<!-- "TeX, XML, and Digital Typography" (A. Syropoulos et al., -->
<!-- eds.), Lecture Notes in Computer Science 3130, Springer-Verlag -->
<!-- Berlin-Heidelberg, 2004. ISBN 3-540-22801-2. -->
 
<!-- **************************************************************** -->

<!-- \message{UTF-8 hyphenation patterns for Modern, Monotonic Greek} -->


<hyphen-min before="1" after="1"/>

<exceptions>
</exceptions>

<patterns>
α1
ε1
η1
ι1
ο1
υ1
ω1
ϊ1
ϋ1
ά1
έ1
ή1
ί1
ό1
ύ1
ώ1
ΐ1
ΰ1
α2ι
α2ί
α2ί
ά2ι
ά2ι
ά2ϊ
ά2ϊ
α2υ
α2ύ
α2ύ
ά3υ
ά3υ
ε2ι
ε2ί
ε2ί
έ2ι
έ2ι
έ2ϊ
έ2ϊ
ε2υ
ε2ύ
ε2ύ
έ3υ
έ3υ
η2υ
η2ύ
η2ύ
ή3υ
ή3υ
ο2ι
ο2ί
ο2ί
ό2ι
ό2ι
ό2ϊ
ό2ϊ
ο2υ
ο2ύ
ο2ύ
ό3υ
ό3υ
υ2ι
υ2ί
υ2ί
ύ3ι
ύ3ι
α2η
ά3η.
ά3η.
α2ϊ
ά3ι.
ά3ι.
α2ϋ
ε2ϊ
ε2ϋ
ο2ει
ο2η
ό3η.
ό3η.
ο2ϊ
ό3ι.
ό3ι.
ι2α
ι2ά
ι2ά
ι2ε
ι2έ
ι2έ
ι2ο
ι2ό
ι2ό
ο3ϊ3ό
ο3ϊ3ό
ι2ω
ι2ώ
ι2ώ
.ι3
.ί3
.ί3
η2α
η2ά
η2ά
η2ε
η2έ
η2έ
η2ο
η2ό
η2ό
η2ω
η2ώ
η2ώ
.η3
.ή3
.ή3
υ2α
υ2ά
υ2ά
υ2ο
υ2ό
υ2ό
υ2ω
υ2ώ
υ2ώ
.υ3
.ύ3
.ύ3
4β.
4γ.
4γκ.
4δ.
4ζ.
4θ.
4κ.
4λ.
4μ.
4μπ.
4ν.
4ντ.
4ξ.
4π.
4ρ.
4σ.
4ϲ.
4ς.
4τ.
4τζ.
4τσ.
4τϲ.
4τς.
4φ.
4χ.
4ψ.
4’
4ʼ
4᾿
4β’
4βʼ
4β᾿
4γ’
4γʼ
4γ᾿
4δ’
4δʼ
4δ᾿
4ζ’
4ζʼ
4ζ᾿
4θ’
4θʼ
4θ᾿
4κ’
4κʼ
4κ᾿
4λ’
4λʼ
4λ᾿
4μ’
4μʼ
4μ᾿
4μπ’
4μπʼ
4μπ᾿
4ν’
4νʼ
4ν᾿
4ντ’
4ντ’
4ντ᾿
4ξ’
4ξʼ
4ξ᾿
4π’
4πʼ
4π᾿
4ρ’
4ρʼ
4ρ᾿
4σ’
4σʼ
4σ᾿
4ϲ’
4ϲʼ
4ϲ᾿
4τ’
4τʼ
4τ᾿
4τζ’
4τζʼ
4τζ᾿
4τσ’
4τσʼ
4τσ᾽
4τϲ’
4τϲʼ
4τϲ᾿
4φ’
4φʼ
4φ᾿
4χ’
4χʼ
4χ᾿
4ψ’
4ψʼ
4ψ᾿
.β4
.γ4
.δ4
.ζ4
.θ4
.κ4
.λ4
.μ4
.ν4
.ξ4
.π4
.ρ4
.σ4
.ϲ4
.τ4
.φ4
.χ4
.ψ4
4β1β
4γ1γ
4δ1δ
4ζ1ζ
4θ1θ
4κ1κ
4λ1λ
4μ1μ
4ν1ν
4π1π
4ρ1ρ
4σ1σ
4ϲ1ϲ
4τ1τ
4φ1φ
4χ1χ
4ψ1ψ
4β1ζ
4β1θ
4β1κ
4β1μ
4β1ν
4β1ξ
4β1π
4β1σ
4β1ϲ
4β1τ
4β1φ
4β1χ
4β1ψ
4γ1β
4γ1ζ
4γ1θ
4γ1μ
4ρ5γ2μ
4γ1ξ
4γ1π
4γ1σ
4γ1ϲ
4γ1τ
4γ1φ
4γ1χ
4γ1ψ
4δ1β
4δ1γ
4δ1ζ
4δ1θ
4δ1κ
4δ1λ
4δ1ξ
4δ1π
4δ1σ
4δ1ϲ
4δ1τ
4δ1φ
4δ1χ
4δ1ψ
4ζ1β
4ζ1γ
4ζ1δ
4ζ1θ
4ζ1κ
4ζ1λ
4ζ1μ
τζ2μ
4ζ1ν
4ζ1ξ
4ζ1π
4ζ1ρ
4ζ1σ
4ζ1ϲ
4ζ1τ
4ζ1φ
4ζ1χ
4ζ1ψ
4θ1β
4θ1γ
4θ1δ
4θ1ζ
4θ1κ
4θ1μ
4ρ5θ2μ
σθ2μ
ϲθ2μ
4θ1ξ
4θ1π
4θ1σ
4θ1ϲ
4θ1τ
4θ1φ
4θ1χ
4θ1ψ
4κ1β
4κ1γ
4κ1δ
4κ1ζ
4κ1θ
4κ1μ
4λ5κ2μ
4ρ5κ2μ
4κ1ξ
4κ1π
4κ1σ
4κ1ϲ
4κ1φ
4ν5κ2φ
4κ1χ
4κ1ψ
4λ1β
4λ1γ
4λ1δ
4λ1ζ
4λ1θ
4λ1κ
4λ1μ
4λ1ν
4λ1ξ
4λ1π
4λ1ρ
4λ1σ
4λ1ϲ
4λ1τ
4λ1φ
4λ1χ
4λ1ψ
4μ1β
4μ1γ
4μ1δ
4μ1ζ
4μ1θ
4μ1κ
4μ1λ
4μ1ξ
4μ1ρ
4μ1σ
4μ1ϲ
4μ1τ
4μ1φ
4μ1χ
4μ1ψ
4ν1β
4ν1γ
4ν1δ
4ν1ζ
4ν1θ
4ν1κ
4ν1λ
4ν1μ
4ν1ξ
4ν1π
4ν1ρ
4ν1σ
4ν1ϲ
4ν1φ
4ν1χ
4ν1ψ
4ξ1β
4ξ1γ
4ξ1δ
4ξ1ζ
4ξ1θ
4ξ1κ
4ξ1λ
4ξ1μ
4ξ1ν
4ξ1π
4ξ1ρ
4ξ1σ
4ξ1ϲ
4ξ1τ
4γ5ξ2τ
4ρ5ξ2τ
4ξ1φ
4ξ1χ
4ξ1ψ
4π1β
4π1γ
4π1δ
4π1ζ
4π1θ
4π1κ
4π1μ
4π1ξ
4π1σ
4π1ϲ
4π1φ
4π1χ
4π1ψ
4ρ1β
4ρ1γ
4ρ1δ
4ρ1ζ
4ρ1θ
4ρ1κ
4ρ1λ
4ρ1μ
4ρ1ν
4ρ1ξ
4ρ1π
4ρ1σ
4ρ1ϲ
4ρ1τ
4ρ1φ
4ρ1χ
4ρ1ψ
4σ1δ
4ϲ1δ
4σ1ζ
4ϲ1ζ
4σ1ν
4ϲ1ν
4σ1ξ
4ϲ1ξ
4σ1ρ
4ϲ1ρ
4σ1ψ
4ϲ1ψ
4τ1β
4τ1γ
4τ1δ
4τ1θ
4τ1κ
4τ1ν
4τ1ξ
4τ1π
4τ1φ
στ2φ
ϲτ2φ
4τ1χ
4τ1ψ
4φ1β
4φ1γ
4φ1δ
4φ1ζ
4φ1κ
4φ1μ
4φ1ν
4ρ5φ2ν
4φ1ξ
4φ1π
4φ1σ
4φ1ϲ
4φ1χ
4φ1ψ
4χ1β
4χ1γ
4χ1δ
4χ1ζ
4χ1κ
4χ1μ
4ρ5χ2μ
4χ1ξ
4χ1π
4χ1σ
4χ1ϲ
4χ1φ
4χ1ψ
4ψ1β
4ψ1γ
4ψ1δ
4ψ1ζ
4ψ1θ
4ψ1κ
4ψ1λ
4ψ1μ
4ψ1ν
4ψ1ξ
4ψ1π
4ψ1ρ
4ψ1σ
4ψ1ϲ
4ψ1τ
4μ5ψ2τ
4ψ1φ
4ψ1χ
4γ5κ2φ
4γ1κτ
4μ1πτ
4ν1τζ
4ν1τσ
4ν1τϲ
4βρ.
4γλ.
4κλ.
4κτ.
4γκς.
4γκϲ.
4γκσ.
6κς.
6κϲ.
4κσ.
4λς.
4λϲ.
4λσ.
4μπλ.
4μπν.
4μπρ.
4μς.
4μϲ.
4μσ.
4νς.
4νϲ.
4νσ.
4ρς.
4ρϲ.
4ρσ.
4σκ.
4ϲκ.
4στ.
4ϲτ.
4τλ.
4τρ.
4ντς.
4ντϲ.
4ντσ.
4φτ.
4χτ.
4γκ1μπ
4γκ1ντ
4γκ1τζ
4γκ1τσ
4γκ1τϲ
4μπ1ντ
4μπ1τζ
4μπ1τσ
4μπ1τϲ
4ντ1μπ
4τσ1γκ
4τϲ1γκ
4τσ1μπ
4τϲ1μπ
4τσ1ντ
4τϲ1ντ
</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
